Wyoming, session 2025, HB0150.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-14-119 is created to read:

11-14-119. Meat processors; sale of composted
material as fertilizer, soil amendment or soil conditioner;
definitions.

HB0150

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0516
(a) Meat processors that are licensed federally or by
the state shall be permitted to compost nonedible portions
of processed animals from their processing plants,
excluding specified risk materials, and distribute the
composted material as fertilizer, soil amendment or soil
conditioner.

(b) Meat processors that distribute their compost as
fertilizer, soil amendment or soil conditioner shall
register the fertilizer, soil amendment or soil conditioner
with the department of agriculture pursuant to W.S.
11-14-104 and follow any other requirements for
distributing commercial fertilizer, soil amendment or soil
conditioner under W.S. 11-14-101 through 11-14-118.

(c) As used in this section, "specified risk
materials" means:

(i) The brain, skull, eyes, trigeminal ganglia,
spinal cord, vertebral column (excluding the vertebrae of
the tail, the transverse processes of the thoracic and
lumbar vertebrae, and the wings of the sacrum), and dorsal
HB0150

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0516
root ganglia from cattle thirty (30) months of age and
older; and

(ii) The distal ileum of the small intestine and
the tonsils from all cattle.

Section 2. W.S. 11-14-103(a)(xxv) is amended to read:

11-14-103. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xxv) "This act" means W.S. 11-14-101 through
11-14-118 11-14-119.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0150